Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4647.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 41. (1) Offense variable 11 is criminal sexual penetration. Score offense variable 11 by determining which of the following apply and by assigning the number of points attributable to the one that has the highest number of points: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 (a) Two or more criminal sexual penetrations occurred 50 points (b) Two or more criminal sexual penetrations of a companion animal occurred 25 points (c) (b) One criminal sexual penetration occurred 25 points (d) One criminal sexual penetration of a companion animal occurred 15 points (e) (c) No criminal sexual penetration occurred 0 points (2) All of the following apply to scoring offense variable 11: (a) Score all sexual penetrations of the victim or a companion animal by the offender arising out of the sentencing offense. (b) Multiple sexual penetrations of the victim or a companion animal by the offender extending beyond the sentencing offense may be scored in offense variables 12 or 13. (c) Do not score points for the 1 penetration that forms the basis of a first- or third-degree criminal sexual conduct offense or an offense against a companion animal under section 158 of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.158. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 4646 (request no. H02034'25). (b) House Bill No. 4651 (request no. H02052'25).